Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20264-213
Civil investigative demands; Attorney General; powers.

(1) In order to ensure compliance with the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act, if the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any act or practice in violation of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act, the Attorney General shall have the power to issue civil investigative demands to persons suspected of being agents of foreign principals from adversary nations or foreign terrorist organizations.

(2) The Attorney General may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the act.

(3) In conducting investigations of potential violations of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act and in enforcing the act, the Attorney General shall not infringe upon the protections set forth in the Personal Privacy Protection Act.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 13.

Personal Privacy Protection Act, see section 20-801.